Utah statutes.
16-16-823.   Resignation and removal of officers.

(1)  The board of directors may remove an officer at any time with or without cause.

(2)  An officer of a limited cooperative association may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the association.  Unless the notice specifies a later time, the resignation is effective when the notice is given.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

